src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-nwtkaaz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - nõtkāz: # adjectives 170 'eng /est nõtke/fin' - full paradigm
     nõtkāz+A+Sg+Nom: nõtkāz
     nõtkāz+A+Sg+Gen: nõtkõ
     nõtkāz+A+Sg+Par: nõtkāzt
     nõtkāz+A+Sg+Dat: nõtkān
     nõtkāz+A+Sg+Ins: nõtkāks
     nõtkāz+A+Sg+Ill: [nõtkõ, nõtkõz]
     nõtkāz+A+Sg+Ela: nõtkāst
     nõtkāz+A+Pl+Nom: nõtkõd
     nõtkāz+A+Pl+Gen: nõtkõd
     nõtkāz+A+Pl+Par: nõtkīdi
     nõtkāz+A+Pl+Dat: nõtkõdõn
     nõtkāz+A+Pl+Ins: nõtkõdõks
     nõtkāz+A+Pl+Ill: nõtkīž
     nõtkāz+A+Pl+Ela: nõtkīst
